Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,138
Local laws of political subdivisions; effect of act.

No political subdivision or municipality within the State of Nebraska in which candidates for their elective offices or elected officials are subject to the requirements of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act shall require compliance with local provisions governing campaign receipts and expenditures or financial disclosures which are different from those established by the act.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 138;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 65.